Hawaii statutes.
[§76-13.5] Classification. (a) Each
director shall establish, implement, and maintain one or more classification
systems covering all civil service positions, not otherwise exempted by rules.
The classification systems shall be constructed with the objective of achieving
equal pay for equal work as provided in section 76-1. The director shall adopt
rules that allow for the administrative review of classification and initial
pricing actions.

(b) Wherever reference is made in statutes
that positions are either subject to or exempt from "chapter 77"
prior to July 1, 2002, the positions shall be subject or exempt from the
appropriate classification systems established under this section. [L 2000, c
253, §3]

Revision Note

"July 1,
2002" substituted for "the effective date of this Act".

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next